csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_rfx.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+1Sg: waabandizosiwaan
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+2Sg: waabandizosiwan
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2pl+2pl: waabandizosiweg
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlProx: waabandizosigwaa
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabandizosinid
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgProx: waabandizosig
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+Excl: waabandizosiwaang
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+Incl: waabandizosiwang
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+1Sg: waabandizoyaan
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+2Sg: waabandizoyan
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2pl+2pl: waabandizoyeg
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlProx: waabandizowaad
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabandizonid
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgProx: waabandizod
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+Excl: waabandizoyaang
     waabandizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+Incl: waabandizoyang
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+1Sg: niwaabandizosii
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+2Sg: giwaabandizosii
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+2Pl: giwaabandizosisiim
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlProx: waabandizosiiwag
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3SgObv: waabandizosiiwan
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3PlObv: waabandizosiiwa'
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgProx: waabandizosii
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+Excl: niwaabandizosiimin
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+Incl: giwaabandizosiimin
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+1Sg: niwaabandiz
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+2Sg: giwaabandiz
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlProx: waabandizowag
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3SgObv: waabandizowan
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3PlObv: waabandizowa'
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgProx: waabandizo
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+Excl: niwaabandizomin
     waabandizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+Incl: giwaabandizomin
     waabandizo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+2Sg: waabandizon
     waabandizo+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+Incl: waabandizodaa
     waabandizo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+2Sg: waabandizoken
     waabandizo+VAI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+Incl: waabandizosiidaa
